Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB197.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(a) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 301. Commonwealth agencies.(a) [Requirement] Public records requirement.--A Commonwealth agency shall provide public records in accordance with this act.(a.1) Live telephone service requirement.--When receiving a 123456789101112131415161718192021 telephone call DURING REGULAR BUSINESS HOURS on a publicly accessible telephone line, a Commonwealth agency:(1) Shall allow the individual placing the telephone call to speak with an employee of the Commonwealth agency who is able to answer questions about, provide information on and provide assistance with services and duties of the Commonwealth agency.(2) May not use a computer system or other automated answering system that impedes the individual placing the telephone call from speaking with an employee of the Commonwealth agency . , OTHER THAN A CALL DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM THAT QUEUES AND DIRECTS INCOMING TELEPHONE CALLS TO AN AVAILABLE EMPLOYEE. A COMPUTER OR OTHER AUTOMATED ANSWERING SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES AN OPTION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL PLACING THE TELEPHONE CALL MAY SELECT TO SPEAK WITH A LIVE EMPLOYEE OF THE COMMONWEALTH AGENCY SHALL CONSTITUTE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0197PN1818 - 2 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819